Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,210
State Administrator.

The director of the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency shall serve as the State Administrator of the Nebraska Emergency Planning and Community Right to Know Act.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 20;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 760;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 147;

Laws 2025, LB346, § 56;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 46.
July 1, 2026